Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2415
Jail convict labor; disposition of proceeds.

It shall be the duty of the county board to make the contracts for the employment of convicts as specified in section 29-2414, and the sheriff of the county, or such other person as may be charged with the administrative direction of the jail, shall collect the proceeds of all such labor, and after paying the board of such convicts and the expenses incident to such labor, to pay the balance to the county treasurer within ten days.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 532, p. 839;

R.S.1913, § 9202;

C.S.1922, § 10209;

C.S.1929, § 29-2415;

R.S.1943, § 29-2415;

Laws 1984, LB 394, § 8.